pl: Faktura powierzchni kołka: Żłobkowana/rowkowana; Radełkowana/teksturowana; Prążkowana; Gładka; Spiralna; Inne
bg-BG: Повърхностна текстура на дюбела: Набразден/с канали; Накатен/текстуриран; Оребрен; Гладък; Спирален; Друго
tr: Dübel yüzey dokusu: Oluklu/yivli; Tırtıllı/dokulu; Nervürlü; Pürüzsüz; Sarmal; Diğer
hu: Dübel felületi textúrája: Hornyolt/barázdált; Recézett/texturált; Bordázott; Sima; Spirális; Egyéb
fi: Tapin pinnan tekstuuri: Uritettu/uurrettu; Rihletty/kuvioitu; Uurrettu; Sileä; Kierteinen; Muu
fr: Texture de la surface de la cheville: Cannelé/rainuré; Moleté/texturé; Nervuré; Lisse; En spirale; Autre
el: Υφή επιφάνειας πείρου: Ραβδωτό/με αυλακώσεις; Σαγρέ/ανάγλυφο; Ριγωτό; Λείο; Σπιράλ; Άλλο
th: ลักษณะพื้นผิวของหมุดไม้: เป็นร่อง/เซาะร่อง; พิมพ์ลาย/มีพื้นผิว; ร่องลูกฟูก; เรียบ; เกลียว; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Površinska tekstura lesene vezi: Žlebljeno/z utori; Narebričeno/teksturirano; Rebrasto; Gladko; Spiralno; Drugo
es: Textura de la superficie de la espiga: Estriado/acanalado; Moleteado/texturizado; Acanalado; Liso; Espiral; Otro
it: Texture della superficie del tassello: Scanalata; Zigrinata/testurizzata; A coste; Liscia; A spirale; Altro
da: Overfladetekstur på dyvel: Rillet/furet; Rouletteret/tekstureret; Riflet; Glat; Spiral; Andet
pt-BR: Textura da superfície do pino: Ranhurada/canelada; Serrilhada/texturizada; Estriada; Lisa; Espiral; Outros
ru: Текстура поверхности шканта: Рифленый/с желобками; С накаткой/текстурированный; Ребристый; Гладкий; Спиральный; Другое
zh-TW: 榫釘表面紋理: 凹槽/溝紋; 滾花/紋理; 條紋; 平滑; 螺旋狀; 其他
vi: Kết cấu bề mặt của thanh chốt gỗ: Có rãnh; Khía nhám/có kết cấu; Gân; Nhẵn; Xoắn ốc; Khác
lt-LT: Kaiščio paviršiaus tekstūra: Rifliuotas / su grioveliais; Rantuotas / tekstūrinis; Briaunuotas; Lygus; Spiralinis; Kita
en: Dowel surface texture: Fluted/Grooved; Knurled/Textured; Ribbed; Smooth; Spiral; Other
cs: Struktura povrchu kolíku: Drážkovaný/rýhovaný; Vroubkovaný/texturovaný; Žebrovaný; Hladký; Spirálový; Jiné
nl: Oppervlaktestaat deuvel: Gegroefd; Gekarteld/getextureerd; Geribbeld; Glad; Spiraal; Overige
ro-RO: Textura suprafeței diblului: Canelat/striat; Randalinat/texturat; Nervurat; Neted; Spiralat; Altele
de: Dübeloberflächentextur: Gerillt/Gekerbt; Gerändelt/Strukturiert; Gerippt; Glatt; Spiralförmig; Sonstige
nb: Overflatetekstur på trepinne: Riflet/rillet; Ru/teksturert; Ribbet; Glatt; Spiral; Annet
pt-PT: Textura da superfície do perno: Ranhurado/estriado; Serrilhado/texturado; Com nervuras; Liso; Espiral; Outro
ko: 다보 표면 질감: 플루트/그루브; 널링/텍스처 처리; 리브 처리; 매끄러움; 나선형; 기타
hr-HR: Tekstura površine tipla: Žljebasto / s utorima; Nareckano/teksturirano; Rebrasto; Glatko; Spiralno; Ostalo
sk-SK: Textúra povrchu spojovacieho kolíka: Drážkovaná; Vrúbkovaná/textúrovaná; Rebrovaná; Hladká; Špirálová; Iná
ja: ダボ表面テクスチャ: 溝付き; ローレット/テクスチャ; リブ付き; スムーズ; スパイラル; その他
sv: Kulans yta: Räfflad/spårad; Lettrad/strukturerad; Ribbad; Slät; Spiral; Övrigt
zh-CN: 木榫表面纹理: 凹槽/沟槽; 滚花/纹理; 罗纹; 平滑; 螺旋; 其他